Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.054

Disability retirement—Criminal conduct.

A member shall not receive a disability retirement benefit under RCW 41.40.200, 41.40.220, 41.40.230, 41.40.235, 41.40.250, 41.40.670, or 41.40.825 if the disability is the result of criminal conduct by the member committed after April 21, 1997.

[ 2000 c 247 s 104; 1997 c 103 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1997 c 103: See notes following RCW 41.26.061.